Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-273
Game and Parks Commission; convey
property to city of Atkinson.

The
Game and Parks Commission is authorized to convey to the city of Atkinson
for public park purposes the following described real estate now known as
Atkinson State Recreation Area, situated in the county of Holt, in the State
of Nebraska, to-wit: A tract of land in Blocks 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59,
and 60, all in Mathew's Addition to Atkinson, Holt County, Nebraska; and the
southeast quarter of the southwest quarter of section 30, township 30 north,
range 14 west of the 6th principal meridian, excepting therefrom a parcel
described as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of the southeast
quarter of the southwest quarter, section 30, township 30 north, range 14
west of the 6th principal meridian, thence running due north 42.42 rods; thence
running due east 36.36 rods; thence running due south 24.24 rods; thence running
due east 18.18 rods; thence running due south 18.18 rods; thence running due
west 54.54 rods to the place of beginning, containing 49.51 acres, more or
less, Holt County, Nebraska; the southwest quarter of section 30, township
30 north, range 14 west, Holt County, Nebraska; and that part of the southwest
quarter of the southeast quarter of section 30, township 30 north, range 14
west of the 6th principal meridian, Holt County, Nebraska, described as follows:
Commencing at the northwest corner of the southwest quarter of the southeast
quarter of said section 30, thence running on a line south 57 degrees, 35
minutes, east a distance of 347.56 feet, thence due south a distance of 433.75
feet, thence due west a distance of 293.38 feet, thence due north a distance
of 620.1 feet to the point of beginning containing 3.55 acres, more or less,
except that if the city of Atkinson ceases to operate the lands conveyed as
a public park and recreation area, title to such lands shall revert to the
Game and Parks Commission.

Laws 2010, LB743, § 2.